Arkansas, session 2025, HB1988.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 23-112-614(c)(2), concerning the transfer
of special revenues derived from auto auction fees for salvage-titled or
parts-only titled vehicles, is amended to read as follows:
(2) Fifty percent (50%) for the Division of Arkansas State
Police to be used for inspection and oversight of auto auctions operations of
the Division of Arkansas State Police.

/s/Tosh




*ZRC124*
04-09-2025 11:12:23 ZRC124